Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2008
Common-law rule; superseded.

The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act supersedes the rule of common law known as the rule against perpetuities.

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 8.